Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-2010
Juror; affirmation; form.

Any juror shall be allowed to make affirmation, and the words this you do as you shall answer under the pains and penalties of perjury shall be substituted instead of the words so help you God.

G.S.1873, c. 58, § 472, p. 827;

R.S.1913, § 9113;

C.S.1922, § 10138;

C.S.1929, § 29-2010;

R.S.1943, § 29-2010.